test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-01herrae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - herrä: # Noun (1) herrä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     herrä+N+Sg+Nom: herrä
     herrä+N+Sg+Gen: herrä
     herrä+N+Sg+Par: herrät
     herrä+N+Sg+Ill: [herrähte, herräde]
     herrä+N+Sg+Ine: [herrän, herräh, herrähn]
     herrä+N+Sg+Ela: herräst
     herrä+N+Sg+All: herräle
     herrä+N+Sg+Ade: herräl
     herrä+N+Sg+Abl: herrält
     herrä+N+Sg+Tra: herräs
     herrä+N+Sg+Ter: herräniq
     herrä+N+Sg+Abe: herräldäq
     herrä+N+Sg+Com: herrägaq
     herrä+N+Pl+Nom: herräq
     herrä+N+Pl+Gen: herräde
     herrä+N+Pl+Par: [herräsit, herräsiid]
     herrä+N+Pl+Ill: [herrädehe, herrädede]
     herrä+N+Pl+Ine: [herräden, herrädeh, herrädehn]
     herrä+N+Pl+Ela: herrädest
     herrä+N+Pl+All: herrädele
     herrä+N+Pl+Ade: herrädel
     herrä+N+Pl+Abl: herrädelt
     herrä+N+Pl+Tra: herrädes
     herrä+N+Pl+Ter: herrädeniq
     herrä+N+Pl+Abe: herrädeldäq
     herrä+N+Pl+Com: herrädegaq
